Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.140

Materials specifically authorized to be printed and distributed.

The secretary of state is hereby specifically authorized to print, reprint, and distribute the following materials:

(1) Lists of active corporations;

(2) The provisions of Title 23 RCW;

(3) The provisions of Title 23B RCW;

(4) The provisions of Title 24 RCW;

(5) The provisions of chapter 25.10 RCW;

(6) The provisions of Title 29A RCW;

(7) The provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW;

(8) The provisions of chapter 19.77 RCW;

(9) The provisions of chapter 43.07 RCW;

(10) The provisions of the Washington state Constitution;

(11) The provisions of chapters 40.14, 40.16, and 40.20 RCW, and any statutes, rules, schedules, indexes, guides, descriptions, or other materials related to the public records of state or local government or to the state archives; and

(12) Rules and informational publications related to the statutory provisions set forth above.

[ 2015 c 53 s 70; 1991 c 72 s 55; 1982 c 35 s 189; 1973 1st ex.s. c 85 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.